Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.320

Agreement and order provisions for research.

Any marketing agreement or order may provide for research in the production, processing, and/or distribution of the affected commodity and for the expenditure of money for such purposes. Insofar as practicable, such research shall be carried out by experiment stations of Washington state university but if in the judgment of the director or his or her designee said experiment stations do not have adequate facilities for a particular project or if some other research agency has better facilities therefor, the project may be carried out by other research agencies selected by the director or his or her designee.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6077; 1961 c 256 s 32.]